Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-301
Department of Banking and Finance; general powers.

The Governor, through the agency of the Director of Banking and Finance, is vested with the power to regulate, supervise, and shall have general control over trade and commerce of the state and in addition to such general powers herein conferred, he is vested with the power and charged with the duty of enforcing, through the agency of the director, all of the provisions of Chapter 8. The Department of Banking and Finance shall collect, collate, assort, systematize and report statistical details of the manufacturing industries and commerce of the state, and shall acquire information and report upon the general conditions so far as production is concerned of the leading industries of the state.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. I, § 1, p. 572;

C.S.1922, § 7742;

C.S.1929, § 81-3401;

R.S.1943, § 81-301;

Laws 1969, c. 778, § 3, p. 2951;

Laws 1976, LB 561, § 6.

Suit instituted by Department of Insurance against citizens of another state, to recover assets of insolvent surety company in charge of department, is suit by state, and not within jurisdiction of federal court. Hertz v. Knudson, 6 F.2d 812 (8th Cir. 1925).